Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2729
Issuance of bonds; city covenants and powers.

Any city may in connection with the issuance of its bonds under section 18-2724:

(1) Covenant as to the use of any or all of the property, real or personal, acquired pursuant to its economic development program;

(2) Redeem the bonds, covenant for their redemption, and provide the terms and conditions of redemption;

(3) Covenant to charge or seek necessary approval to charge rates, fees, and charges sufficient to meet operating and maintenance expenses of the agency, costs of renewals and replacements to a project, interest and principal payments, whether at maturity or upon sinking-fund redemption, on any outstanding bonds or other indebtedness of the city, and creation and maintenance of any reasonable reserves therefor and to provide for any margins or coverages over and above debt service on the bonds deemed desirable for the marketability or security of the bonds;

(4) Covenant and prescribe as to events of default and terms and conditions upon which any or all of its bonds shall become or may be declared due before maturity, as to the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived, and as to the consequences of default and the remedies of bondholders;

(5) Covenant as to the mortgage or pledge of or the grant of any other security interest in any real or personal property and all or any part of the revenue from any property, contract, or other source within the city's economic development program to secure the payment of bonds, subject to such agreements with the holders of outstanding bonds as may then exist;

(6) Covenant as to the custody, collection, securing, investment, and payment of any revenue, assets, money, funds, or property with respect to which the city may have any rights or interest pursuant to the economic development program;

(7) Covenant as to the purposes to which the proceeds from the sale of any bonds may be applied and the pledge of such proceeds to secure the payment of the bonds;

(8) Covenant as to limitations on the issuance of any additional bonds, the terms upon which additional bonds may be issued and secured, and the refunding of outstanding bonds;

(9) Covenant as to the rank or priority of any bonds with respect to any lien or security;

(10) Covenant as to the procedure by which the terms of any contract with or for the benefit of the bondholders may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds the holders of which must consent thereto, and the manner in which such consent may be given;

(11) Covenant as to the custody, safekeeping, and insurance of any of the properties or investments of the city and the use and disposition of insurance proceeds;

(12) Covenant as to the vesting in a trustee or trustees, within or outside the state, of such properties, rights, powers, and duties in trust as the city may determine;

(13) Covenant as to the appointing and providing for the duties and obligations of a paying agent or paying agents or other fiduciaries within or outside the state;

(14) Make all other covenants and do any and all such acts and things as may be necessary, convenient, or desirable in order to secure its bonds or, in the absolute discretion of the city, tend to make the bonds more marketable, notwithstanding that such covenants, acts, or things may not be enumerated in this section; and

(15) Execute all instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the economic development program granted or in the performance of covenants or duties, which instruments may contain such covenants and provisions as any purchaser of bonds may reasonably require.

Laws 1993, LB 732, § 6.